North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 16. Postmortem Investigation and Disposition.
§ 130A-412.7.
Manner of making anatomical gift before donor’s death.

A donor may make an anatomical gift by any of the following methods:

By authorizing that a statement or symbol be imprinted on the donor’s drivers license or identification card indicating that the donor has made an anatomical gift. A donor who originally became a donor in another jurisdiction by this method and applies
for a drivers license or identification card in this State is required to authorize that a statement or symbol be imprinted on the donor’s drivers license or identification card issued in this State in order for the anatomical
gift to be valid under this subdivision. Anatomical gifts made by this method shall not include a donation of the donor’s body.

In a will.

During a terminal illness or injury of the donor, by any form of communication addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness.

As provided in subsection (b) of this section.

A donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under

G.S. 130A-412.6

may make a gift by a signed donor card or other record signed by the donor or other person making the gift or by authorizing that a statement or symbol indicating that the donor has made an anatomical gift be included
on a donor registry. If the donor or other person is physically unable to sign a record, the record may be signed by another individual at the direction of the donor or other person and must:

Be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the donor or the other person; and

State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Revocation, suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a drivers license or identification card upon which an anatomical gift is indicated does not invalidate the gift.

(c1)
A statement or symbol on a drivers license or identification card issued in this State indicating that the donor has made an anatomical gift shall remain on the donor’s drivers license or identification card until
the donor revokes consent to make an anatomical gift by requesting removal of the statement or symbol from the drivers license or identification card in the manner prescribed by the Division of Motor Vehicles.

An anatomical gift made by will takes effect upon the donor’s death whether or not the will is probated. Invalidation of the will after the donor’s death does not invalidate the gift.

History.
2007-538, s. 1; 2019-143, s. 1; 2021-32, ss. 1, 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-143, s.1, effective October 1, 2019, deleted “tissue or” preceding “the donor’s body” at the end of subdivision (a)(1).

Session Laws 2021-32, ss. 1, 2, effective October 1, 2021, added the next to last sentence in subdivision (a)(1); and added subsection (c1).

§ 130A-412.8.
Amending or revoking anatomical gift before donor’s death.

Subject to

G.S. 130A-412.10

, a donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under

G.S. 130A-412.6

may amend or revoke an anatomical gift by:

A record signed by:

The donor;

The other person; or

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, another individual acting at the direction of the donor or the other person if the donor or other person is physically unable to sign; or

A later-executed document of gift that amends or revokes a previous anatomical gift or portion of an anatomical gift, either expressly or by inconsistency.

A record signed pursuant to sub-subdivision c. of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section must:

Be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the donor or the other person; and

State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Subject to

G.S. 130A-412.10

, a donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under

G.S. 130A-412.6

may revoke an anatomical gift by the destruction or cancellation of the document of gift, or the portion of the document of gift used to make the gift, with the intent to revoke the gift.

A donor may amend or revoke an anatomical gift that was not made in a will by any form of communication during a terminal illness or injury addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness.

A donor who makes an anatomical gift in a will may amend or revoke the gift in the manner provided for amendment or revocation of wills or as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.9.
Refusal to make anatomical gift; effect of refusal.

An individual may refuse to make an anatomical gift of the individual’s body or body part by:

A record signed by:

The individual; or

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, another individual acting at the direction of the individual if the individual is physically unable to sign;

The individual’s will, whether or not the will is admitted to probate or invalidated after the individual’s death; or

Any form of communication made by the individual during the individual’s terminal illness or injury addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness.

A record signed pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section must:

Be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the individual; and

State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

An individual who has made a refusal may amend or revoke the refusal:

In the manner provided in subsection (a) of this section for making a refusal;

By subsequently making an anatomical gift pursuant to

G.S. 130A-412.7

that is inconsistent with the refusal; or

By destroying or canceling the record evidencing the refusal, or the portion of the record used to make the refusal, with the intent to revoke the refusal.

Except as otherwise provided in G.S. 130A-412.10(h), in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the individual set forth in the refusal, an individual’s unrevoked refusal to make an anatomical gift of the individual’s body or body part bars
all other persons from making an anatomical gift of the individual’s body or body part.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.10.
Preclusive effect of an anatomical gift, amendment, or revocation.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section and subject to subsection (f) of this section, in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor, a person other than the donor is barred from making, amending, or revoking an
anatomical gift of a donor’s body or body part if either of the following apply:

The donor made an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or body part under

G.S. 130A-412.7

.

The donor made an amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or body part under

G.S. 130A-412.8

.

A donor’s revocation of an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or body part under

G.S. 130A-412.8

is not a refusal and does not bar another person specified in

G.S. 130A-412.6

or

G.S. 130A-412.11

from making an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or body part under

G.S. 130A-412.7

or

G.S. 130A-412.12

.

If a person other than the donor makes an unrevoked anatomical gift of the donor’s body or body part under

G.S. 130A-412.7

or an amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or body part under

G.S. 130A-412.8

, another person may not make, amend, or revoke the gift of the donor’s body or body part under

G.S. 130A-412.12

.

A revocation of an anatomical gift of a donor’s body or body part under

G.S. 130A-412.8

by a person other than the donor does not bar another person from making an anatomical gift of the body or body part under

G.S. 130A-412.7

or

G.S. 130A-412.12

.

In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under

G.S. 130A-412.6

, an anatomical gift of a body part is neither a refusal to give another body part nor a limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of another body part at a later time by the donor or another person.

In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under

G.S. 130A-412.6

, an anatomical gift of a body part for one or more of the purposes set forth in

G.S. 130A-412.6

is not a limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of the body part for any of the other purposes by the donor or any other person under

G.S. 130A-412.7

or

G.S. 130A-412.12

.

If a donor who is an unemancipated minor dies, a parent of the donor who is reasonably available may revoke or amend an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or body part.

If an unemancipated minor who signed a refusal dies, a parent of the minor who is reasonably available may revoke the minor’s refusal.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.11.
Who may make an anatomical gift of decedent’s body or body part.

Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, and unless barred by

G.S. 130A-412.9

or

G.S. 130A-412.10

, an anatomical gift of a decedent’s body or body part for purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education may be made by any member of the following classes of persons who is reasonably available, in
the order of priority listed:

An agent of the decedent at the time of death who could have made an anatomical gift under

G.S. 130A-412.6(2)

immediately before the decedent’s death;

The spouse of the decedent;

Adult children of the decedent;

Parents of the decedent;

Adult siblings of the decedent;

Adult grandchildren of the decedent;

Grandparents of the decedent;

An adult who exhibited special care and concern for the decedent;

The persons who were acting as the guardians of the person of the decedent at the time of death; and

Any other person having the authority to dispose of the decedent’s body.

If there is more than one member of a class listed in subdivision (a)(1), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), or (9) of this section entitled to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical gift may be made by a member of the class unless that member or a person to which
the gift may pass under

G.S. 130A-412.13

knows of an objection by another member of the class. If an objection is known, the gift may be made only by a majority of the members of the class who are reasonably available.

A person may not make an anatomical gift if, at the time of the decedent’s death, a person in a prior class under subsection (a) of this section is reasonably available to make or to object to the making of an anatomical gift.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.12.
Manner of making, amending, or revoking anatomical gift of decedent’s body or body part.

A person authorized to make an anatomical gift under

G.S. 130A-412.11

may make an anatomical gift by a document of gift signed by the person making the gift or by that person’s oral communication that is electronically recorded or is contemporaneously reduced to a record and signed
by the individual receiving the oral communication.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, an anatomical gift by a person authorized under

G.S. 130A-412.11

may be amended or revoked orally or in a record by any member of a prior class who is reasonably available. If more than one member of the prior class is reasonably available, the gift made by a person authorized
under

G.S. 130A-412.11

may be:

Amended only if a majority of the reasonably available members agrees to the amending of the gift; or

Revoked only if a majority of the reasonably available members agrees to the revoking of the gift or if they are equally divided as to whether to revoke the gift.

A revocation under subsection (b) of this section is effective only if, before an incision has been made to remove a body part from the donor’s body or before invasive procedures have begun to prepare the recipient, the procurement organization, transplant
hospital, or physician or technician knows of the revocation.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.13.
Persons that may receive anatomical gift; purpose of anatomical gift.

An anatomical gift may be made to the following persons named in the document of gift:

A hospital; accredited medical school, dental school, college, or university; organ procurement organization; or other appropriate person, including the Commission on Anatomy, for research or education;

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, an individual designated by the person making the anatomical gift if the individual is the recipient of the body part;

An eye bank or tissue bank.

If an anatomical gift to an individual under subdivision (a)(2) of this section cannot be transplanted into the individual, the body part passes in accordance with subsection (g) of this section in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the
person making the anatomical gift.

If an anatomical gift of one or more specific body parts or of all body parts is made in a document of gift that does not name a person described in subsection (a) of this section but identifies the purpose for which an anatomical gift may be used, the
following rules apply:

If the body part is an eye and the gift is for the purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate eye bank.

If the body part is tissue and the gift is for the purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate tissue bank.

If the body part is an organ and the gift is for the purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.

If the body part is an organ, an eye, or tissue and the gift is for the purpose of research or education, the gift passes to the appropriate procurement organization.

For the purpose of subsection (c) of this section, if there is more than one purpose of an anatomical gift set forth in the document of gift but the purposes are not set forth in any priority, the gift must be used for transplantation or therapy, if suitable.
If the gift cannot be used for transplantation or therapy, the gift may be used for research or education.

If an anatomical gift of one or more specific body parts is made in a document of gift that does not name a person described in subsection (a) of this section and does not identify the purpose of the gift, the gift may be used only for transplantation
or therapy, and the gift passes in accordance with subsection (g) of this section.

If a document of gift specifies only a general intent to make an anatomical gift by words such as “donor,” “organ donor,” or “body donor,” or by a symbol or statement of similar import, the gift may be used only for transplantation or therapy, and the
gift passes in accordance with subsection (g) of this section.

For purposes of subsections (b), (e), and (f) of this section, the following rules apply:

If the body part is an eye, the gift passes to the appropriate eye bank.

If the body part is tissue, the gift passes to the appropriate tissue bank.

If the body part is an organ, the gift passes to the appropriate organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.

An anatomical gift of an organ for transplantation or therapy, other than an anatomical gift under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, passes to the organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.

If an anatomical gift does not pass pursuant to subsections (a) through (h) of this section or the decedent’s body or body part is not used for transplantation, therapy, research, or education, then custody of the body or body part passes to the person
under obligation to dispose of the body or body part.

A person may not accept an anatomical gift if the person knows that the gift was not effectively made under

G.S. 130A-412.7

or

G.S. 130A-412.12

or if the person knows that the decedent made a refusal under

G.S. 130A-412.9

that was not revoked. For purposes of this subsection, if a person knows that an anatomical gift was made on a document of gift, the person is deemed to know of any amendment or revocation of the gift or any refusal
to make an anatomical gift on the same document of gift.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, nothing in this act affects the allocation of organs for transplantation or therapy.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.14.
Search and notification.

A search of an individual who is reasonably believed to be dead or near death for a document of gift or other information identifying the individual as a donor or as an individual who made a refusal, and, if applicable, notification of the hospital to
which the individual is taken, shall be governed by

G.S. 90-602

.

History.
2007-538, s. 1; 2008-153, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-153, s. 2, effective August 2, 2008, rewrote the section.

§ 130A-412.15.
Delivery of document of gift not required; right to examine.

A document of gift need not be delivered during the donor’s lifetime to be effective.

Upon or after an individual’s death, a person in possession of a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift with respect to the individual shall allow examination and copying of the document of gift or refusal by a person authorized to make
or object to the making of an anatomical gift with respect to the individual or by a person to which the gift could pass under

G.S. 130A-412.13

.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.16.
Rights and duties of procurement organization and others.

When a hospital refers an individual at or near death to a procurement organization, the organization shall make a reasonable search of the records of the North Carolina Department of Transportation, Division of Motor Vehicles, and any donor registry
that it knows exists for the geographical area in which the individual resides to ascertain whether the individual has made an anatomical gift.

A procurement organization must be allowed reasonable access to information in the records of the North Carolina Department of Transportation, Division of Motor Vehicles, to ascertain whether an individual at or near death is a donor.

When a hospital refers an individual at or near death to a procurement organization, the organization may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to ensure the medical suitability of a body part that is or could be the subject of an anatomical gift
for transplantation, therapy, research, or education from a donor or a prospective donor. During the examination period, measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the body part may not be withdrawn unless the hospital
or procurement organization knows that the individual expressed a contrary intent.

Unless prohibited by law other than this Part, at any time after a donor’s death, the person to which a body part passes under

G.S. 130A-412.13

may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the body or body part for its intended purpose.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law, an examination under subsection (c) or (d) of this section may include an examination of all medical and dental records of the donor or prospective donor.

Upon the death of a minor who was a donor or had signed a refusal, unless a procurement organization knows the minor is emancipated, the procurement organization shall conduct a reasonable search for the parents of the minor and provide the parents with
an opportunity to revoke or amend the anatomical gift or revoke the refusal.

Upon referral by a hospital under subsection (a) of this section, a procurement organization shall make a reasonable search for any person listed in

G.S. 130A-412.11

having priority to make an anatomical gift on behalf of a prospective donor. If a procurement organization receives information that an anatomical gift to any other person was made, amended, or revoked, it shall
promptly advise the other person of all relevant information.

Subject to

G.S. 130A-412.13

(i) and

G.S. 130A-412.25

, the rights of the person to which a body part passes under

G.S. 130A-412.13

are superior to the rights of all others with respect to the body part. The person may accept or reject an anatomical gift in whole or in part. Subject to the terms of the document of gift and this Part, a person
that accepts an anatomical gift of an entire body may allow embalming, burial, or cremation, and use of remains in a funeral service. If the gift is of a body part, the person to which the body part passes under G.S. 130A-412.13,
upon the death of the donor and before embalming, burial, or cremation, shall cause the body part to be removed without unnecessary mutilation.

Neither the physician who attends the decedent at death nor the physician who determines the time of the decedent’s death may participate in the procedures for removing or transplanting a part from the decedent.

A physician or technician may remove a donated body part from the body of a donor that the physician or technician is qualified to remove.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.17.
Coordination of procurement and use.

Each hospital in this State shall enter into agreements or affiliations with procurement organizations for coordination of procurement and use of anatomical gifts.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.18.
Sale or purchase of body parts prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person, that for valuable consideration, knowingly purchases or sells a body part for transplantation or therapy if removal of a body part from an individual is intended to occur after
the individual’s death commits a Class H felony and upon conviction may be fined up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each offense.

A person may charge a reasonable amount for the removal, processing, preservation, quality control, storage, transportation, implantation, or disposal of a body part.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.19.
Other prohibited acts.

A person that, in order to obtain a financial gain, intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or obliterates a document of gift, an amendment or revocation of a document of gift, or a refusal commits a Class H felony and upon conviction may
be fined up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each offense.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.20.
Immunity.

A person that acts with due care in accordance with this Part or with the applicable anatomical gift law of another state, or attempts in good faith to do so, is not liable for the act in a civil action, criminal prosecution, or administrative proceeding.

Neither the person making an anatomical gift nor the donor’s estate is liable for any injury or damage that results from the making or use of the gift.

In determining whether an anatomical gift has been made, amended, or revoked under this Part, a person may rely upon representations of an individual listed in subdivisions (2) through (8) of G.S. 130A-412.11(a) relating to the individual’s relationship
to the donor or prospective donor unless the person knows that the representation is untrue.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.21.
Law governing validity; choice of law as to execution of document of gift; presumption of validity.

A document of gift is valid if executed in accordance with:

This Part;

The laws of the state or country where it was executed; or

The laws of the state or country where the person making the anatomical gift was domiciled, has a place of residence, or was a national at the time the document of gift was executed.

If a document of gift is valid under this section, the law of this State governs the interpretation of the document of gift.

A person may presume that a document of gift or amendment of an anatomical gift is valid unless that person knows that it was not validly executed or was revoked.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.22.
Donor registry.

The online Organ Donor Registry Internet site established pursuant to

G.S. 20-43.2

shall be the State donor registry for anatomical gifts made pursuant to this Part. Requirements for maintenance and use of the State donor registry shall be as provided under

G.S. 20-43.2

.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.23.
Cooperation between a medical examiner and the procurement organization.

The medical examiner shall cooperate with procurement organizations to maximize the opportunity to recover anatomical gifts for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If a medical examiner receives notice from a procurement organization that an anatomical gift might be available or was made with respect to a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner and a postmortem examination is going
to be performed, unless the medical examiner denies recovery in accordance with

G.S. 130A-412.24

, the medical examiner or designee shall conduct a postmortem examination of the body or the body part in a manner and within a period compatible with its preservation for the purposes of the gift.

A body part may not be removed from the body of a decedent under the jurisdiction of a medical examiner for transplantation, therapy, research, or education unless the body part is the subject of an anatomical gift. The body of a decedent under the jurisdiction
of the medical examiner may not be delivered to a person for research or education unless the body is the subject of an anatomical gift. This subsection does not preclude a medical examiner from performing the medicolegal investigation
upon the body or body parts of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner.

As used in this section and

G.S. 130A-412.24

, “medical examiner” includes the Chief Medical Examiner, a county medical examiner, or a designee of either.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§ 130A-412.24.
Facilitation of anatomical gift from decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of a medical examiner.

Upon request of a procurement organization, a medical examiner shall release to the procurement organization the name, contact information, and available medical and social history of a decedent whose body is or will come under the jurisdiction of the
medical examiner. If the decedent’s body or body part is medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education, the medical examiner shall release postmortem examination results to the procurement organization.
The procurement organization may make a subsequent disclosure of the postmortem examination results or other information received from the medical examiner only if relevant to transplantation or therapy.

The medical examiner may conduct a medicolegal examination, including physical examination of a donor or prospective donor and review of all medical records, laboratory test results, X-rays, other diagnostic results, and other information that any person
possesses about a donor or prospective donor whose body is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner or whose body would be under the medical examiner’s jurisdiction upon death and that the medical examiner determines may
be relevant to the investigation.

A person that has any information requested by a medical examiner pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall provide that information as expeditiously as possible to allow the medical examiner to conduct the medicolegal investigation within a period
compatible with the preservation of body parts for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If an anatomical gift has been or might be made of a body part of a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner and a postmortem examination is not required, or the medical examiner determines that a postmortem examination is
required but that the recovery of the body part that is the subject of an anatomical gift will not interfere with the examination, the medical examiner and procurement organization shall cooperate in the timely removal of the body
part from the decedent for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If an anatomical gift of a body part from the decedent under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner has been or might be made, but the medical examiner initially believes that the recovery of the body part could interfere with the postmortem investigation
into the decedent’s cause or manner of death, the collection of evidence, or the description, documentation, or interpretation of injuries on the body, the medical examiner shall consult with the procurement organization or physician
or technician designated by the procurement organization about the proposed recovery. After consultation, the medical examiner may deny or allow the recovery.

If the medical examiner or designee allows recovery of a body part under subsection (d) or (e) of this section, the procurement organization shall provide the medical examiner or designee with a record describing the condition of the body part signed
by the physician or technician who removes the body part and any other information and observations that would assist in the postmortem examination.

History.
2007-538, s. 1.

§§ 130A-412.25 through 130A-412.29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 130A-412.30.
Use of tissue declared a service; standard of care; burden of proof.

The procurement, processing, distribution or use of whole blood, plasma, blood products, blood derivatives and other human tissues such as corneas, bones or organs for the purpose of injecting, transfusing or transplanting any of them into the human body
is declared to be, for all purposes, the rendition of a service by every participating person or institution. Whether or not any remuneration is paid, the service is declared not to be a sale of whole blood, plasma, blood products,
blood derivatives or other human tissues, for any purpose. No person or institution shall be liable in warranty, express or implied, for the procurement, processing, distribution or use of these items but nothing in this section shall
alter or restrict the liability of a person or institution in negligence or tort in consequence of these services.

History.
1971, c. 836; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2007-538, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-412.31.
Giving of blood by persons 16 years of age or more.

A person who is 16 years of age or more may give or donate blood to an individual, hospital, blood bank or blood collection center without the consent of the parent or parents or guardian of the donor. It shall be unlawful for a person under the age of
18 years to sell blood.

History.
1971, c. 10; c. 1093, s. 16; 1977, c. 373; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2007-538, s. 3(a); 2008-153, s. 9.

§ 130A-412.32.
Duty of hospitals to establish organ procurement protocols.

In order to facilitate the goals of this Part, each hospital shall establish written protocols that:

Require that only the organ procurement organization designated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services be notified of all deaths or impending brain deaths meeting criteria for notification as established by the designated organ procurement organization;
and

Ensure that notification required under subdivision (1) of this subsection be made as soon as it is determined that brain death is imminent or cardiac death has occurred.

Hospitals shall provide their federally designated organ procurement organizations and tissue banks reasonable access to patients’ medical records for the purpose of determining organ or tissue donation potential.

The family of any person whose organ or tissue is donated for transplantation shall not be financially liable for any costs related to the evaluation of the suitability of the donor’s organ or tissue for transplantation, or for any costs of retrieval
of the organ or tissue.

Each hospital shall provide its federally designated organ procurement organization with reasonable access during regular business hours to the medical records of deceased patients for the following purposes:

Determining the hospital’s organ and tissue donation potential;

Assessing the educational needs of the hospital in regard to the organ and tissue donation process; and

Providing documentation to the hospital to evaluate the effectiveness of the hospital’s efforts.

Each hospital shall have a signed agreement with its federally designated organ procurement organization that addresses the requirements of this section and the requirements of

G.S. 130A-412.33

.

The requirements of this section, or of any hospital procurement protocols established pursuant to this section, shall not exceed those provided for by the hospital organ protocol provisions of Title XI of the Social Security Act, except for the purposes
of this section the term “organ and tissue donors” shall include cornea and tissue donors for transplantation.

Hospitals and hospital personnel shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability nor to discipline for unprofessional conduct for actions taken in good faith to comply with this section. This subsection shall not provide immunity from civil liability
arising from gross negligence.

History.
1987, c. 719, s. 1; 1989, c. 537, s. 4; 1997-192, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 48; 2007-538, ss. 3(a), 4.

§ 130A-412.33.
Duty of designated organ procurement organizations and tissue banks.

After notification regarding an impending brain death, brain death, or cardiac death has been made to the federally designated organ procurement organization, the federally designated organ procurement organization shall evaluate donation potential.

The federally designated organ procurement organization or tissue bank shall assure that families of potential organ and tissue donors are made aware of the option of organ and tissue donation and their option to decline.

The federally designated organ procurement organization or tissue bank shall, working collaboratively with the hospital, request consent for organ or tissue donation in the order of priority established under

G.S. 130A-412.11

and shall have designated, trained staff available to perform the consent process 24 hours a day, 365 days a year.

The federally designated organ procurement organization or tissue bank shall encourage discretion and sensitivity with respect to the circumstances, views, and beliefs of the families of potential organ and tissue donors.

All hospital and patient information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, and other data obtained or created by a tissue bank or federally designated organ procurement organization from the medical records review described in

G.S. 130A-412.33

shall be privileged and confidential and may be used by the tissue bank or federally designated organ procurement organization only for the purposes set forth in

G.S. 130A-412.33

and shall not be subject to discovery or introduction as evidence in any civil action, suit, or proceeding. However, hospital and patient information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, and other data otherwise
available are not immune from discovery or use in a civil action, suit, or proceeding merely because they were obtained or created by a tissue bank or federally designated organ procurement organization from the medical records
review described in G.S. 130A-412.33.

If the hospital is made a party of any action, suit, or proceeding arising out of the failure of a federally designated organ procurement organization or tissue bank to comply with the requirements of this section, the hospital shall be held harmless
from any and all liability and costs, including the amounts of judgments, settlements, fines, or penalties, and expenses and reasonable attorneys’ fees incurred in connection with the action, suit, or proceeding.

History.
1997-192, s. 3; 2007-538, ss. 3(a), 5, 6.

§ 130A-413.
Coordinated human tissue donation program; legislative findings and purpose; program established.

The General Assembly finds that there is an increasing need for human tissues for transplantation purposes; that there is a continuing need for human tissues for the purposes of medical education and research; and that these needs are not being sufficiently
filled at the present because of a shortage of human tissue donors. The General Assembly establishes a coordinated human tissue donation program to facilitate the acquisition and distribution of human tissues to promote the public
health. For the purposes of this Part, the term “human tissue” includes cadavers.

The Department shall establish and administer a coordinated program among departments and agencies of the State and all groups, both public and private, involved in the acquisition and distribution of human tissue to:

Increase awareness of the need for human tissue donations and of the methods by which these donations are made;

Increase awareness of the existing programs of human tissue transplantation and of medical research and education which employs human tissue and share information with the public;

Study the problems surrounding the acquisition and distribution of human tissue and make suggestions for their solution;

Disseminate information to health and other professionals concerning the techniques of human tissue retrieval and transplantation, the legalities involved in making anatomical gifts; and

Arrange for the quick and precise transportation of donated human tissue in emergency transplant situations.

All departments and agencies of the State and county and municipal law-enforcement agencies shall cooperate with the coordinated human tissue donation program instituted by the Department.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Organ Allocation and the States: Can the States Restrict Broader Organ Sharing?,” see 1999 Duke L.J. 261 (1999).

§ 130A-414.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 719, s. 2.

Part 4A. Nondiscrimination in organ transplantation.

§ 130A-414.1.
Legislative findings and declaration of policy.

The General Assembly of North Carolina makes the following findings and declaration:

A mental or physical disability does not diminish a person’s right to health care.

The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as amended, prohibits discrimination against individuals with disabilities, yet many individuals with disabilities still experience discrimination in accessing critical health care
services.

In other states nationwide, individuals with mental and physical disabilities have been denied lifesaving organ transplants based on assumptions that their lives are less worthy, that they are incapable of complying with post-transplant medical requirements,
or that they lack adequate support systems to ensure compliance with post-transplant medical requirements.

Although organ transplant centers must consider medical and psychosocial criteria when determining if a patient is suitable to receive an organ transplant, transplant centers that participate in Medicare, Medicaid, and other federally funded programs
are required to use patient selection criteria that result in a fair and nondiscriminatory distribution of organs.

North Carolina residents in need of organ transplants are entitled to assurances that they will not encounter discrimination on the basis of a disability.The General Assembly hereby declares that the life of an individual with a disability who needs an
organ transplant is as worthy and valuable as the life of an individual without a disability who needs the same medical service.

History.
2021-64, s. 2(a).